District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Residential Tranquility Second Congressional Review Emergency
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Residential Tranquility Act of 2010, effective May 26, 2011 (D.C. Law 18-
374; D.C. Official Code § 22-2751 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 2 (D.C. Official Code § 22-2751) is amended by adding a new paragraph (4)
to read as follows:
“(4) “Sound amplifying device” means any machine, device, or loudspeaker that
amplifies sound of the human voice, music, or any other sound. The term “sound amplifying
device” shall not include automobile audio systems when used and heard only by the occupants
of the vehicle in which the automobile audio system is installed, personal hearing aids, or
headphones.”.
(b) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 22-2752) is amended by adding new subsections (a-1)
and (a-2) to read as follows:
“(a-1) It is unlawful for a person to use a sound amplifying device to target a residence
for purposes of a demonstration between 7:00 p.m. and 9:00 a.m. in Residential Zones,
Residential Flat Zones, or Residential Apartment Zones, as those terms are defined in the District
of Columbia Zoning Regulations.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(a-2) It is unlawful to continue or resume targeting a residence in violation of this law
after being instructed by a law enforcement officer to cease targeting a residence in violation of
this law.”.
(c) A new section 3a is added to read as follows:
“Sec. 3a. Throwing projectiles at residential property.
“(a) It is unlawful for any person to launch or throw a projectile onto the residential
property of another with the intent to cause fear, intimidate, or retaliate against any person living
or working at that residence.
“(b) A person who violates this section, upon conviction, shall be fined no more than the
amount set forth in section 101 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Amendment Act of 2012,
effective June 11, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-317; D.C. Official Code § 22-3571.01), or incarcerated for
no more than 90 days, or both.”.
Sec. 3. Section 11201a(b)(2) of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government
Improvement Act of 1997, effective October 2, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-233; D.C. Official Code §
24-101.01(b)(2)), is amended by adding a new subparagraph (B-i) to read as follows:
“(B-i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the term expiration
date for a Council appointment to the Corrections Information Council shall be December 7th of
the year in which the term expires.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
3